Hawaii, session 2026, SB403.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the recent 2021 Waikiki beach replenishment project cost Hawaii taxpayers $2,500,000, while the private sector contributed $1,000,000, or less than twenty-nine per cent of the $3,500,000 total project cost.  According to the department of land and natural resources, the Waikiki replenishment is part of a planned maintenance project that will reoccur every five to ten years.  The legislature further finds that replenishment projects in resort areas provide substantial benefit to the travel industry and therefore, that the industry should contribute a greater percentage of total funds towards beach replenishment projects. The purpose of this Act is to limit public sector contribution, if any, for beach replenishment activities that are carried out in a resort zoned area. SECTION 2. Chapter 171, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§171-    Beach replenishment projects; state contribution.  The State or counties shall pay not more than twenty per cent of the cost of any beach replenishment project executed in a resort zoned area." SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________